Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2371.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh S.F. 2371 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 598A.1 Short title. 1 This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the âUniform 2 Family Law Arbitration Actâ . 3 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 598A.2 Definitions. 4 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise 5 requires: 6 1. âArbitration agreementâ means an agreement which subjects 7 a family law dispute to arbitration. 8 2. âArbitration organizationâ means an association, 9 agency, board, commission, or other entity which is neutral 10 and initiates, sponsors, or administers an arbitration or is 11 involved in the selection of an arbitrator. 12 3. âArbitratorâ means an individual selected or appointed, 13 alone or with others, to make an award in a family law dispute 14 which is subject to an arbitration agreement. 15 4. âAwardâ means an interim award, temporary order, or final 16 disposition of a family law dispute by an arbitrator. 17 5. âChild custody disputeâ means a family law dispute 18 regarding legal custody, physical custody, parenting plans, 19 parenting time, or visitation of a child. 20 6. âChild support disputeâ means a family law dispute 21 regarding financial support of a child. 22 7. âCourtâ means a district court which has jurisdiction 23 over a family law dispute. 24 8. âFamily law disputeâ means a contested issue arising 25 under chapter 598, 600B, or 600C. âFamily law disputeâ does not 26 include an issue under section 598A.3, subsection 2. 27 9. âPartyâ means an individual who signs an arbitration 28 agreement and whose rights will be determined by an award. 29 10. âPersonâ means an individual, estate, business 30 or nonprofit entity, public corporation, government or 31 governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality or any 32 other legal entity. 33 11. âProtection orderâ means an injunction or other 34 order, issued under the domestic violence, family violence, 35 -1- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 1/ 20 S.F. 2371 or stalking laws of the issuing jurisdiction, to prevent an 1 individual from engaging in a violent or threatening act 2 against, harassment of, contact, or communication with or being 3 in physical proximity to, another individual who is a party or 4 a child under the custodial responsibility of a party. 5 12. âRecordâ , used as a noun, means information that 6 is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an 7 electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable 8 form. 9 13. âSignâ means, with present intent to authenticate or 10 adopt a record, any of the following: 11 a. To execute or adopt a tangible symbol. 12 b. To attach to or logically associate with the record an 13 electronic symbol, sound, or process. 14 14. âStateâ means a state of the United States, the District 15 of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or 16 any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction 17 of the United States. âStateâ includes a federally recognized 18 Indian tribe. 19 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 598A.3 Scope. 20 1. Except as provided in subsection 2, this chapter governs 21 arbitration of a family law dispute. 22 2. This chapter does not authorize an arbitrator to make an 23 award that does any of the following: 24 a. Grants legal separation, divorce, dissolution of 25 marriage, or annulment. 26 b. Terminates parental rights. 27 c. Grants an adoption or a guardianship of a child or 28 protected person. 29 d. Determines the status of dependency of a child under 30 chapter 232. 31 e. Determines the support of a child if support payments 32 have been assigned to the department of health and human 33 services pursuant to section 234.39, 239B.6, or 252E.11, or if 34 services are being provided by child support services pursuant 35 -2- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 2/ 20 S.F. 2371 to chapter 252B. 1 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 598A.4 Applicable law. 2 1. a. Subject to paragraph âbâ , the law applicable to 3 arbitration is chapter 679A. 4 b. If there is a conflict between chapter 679A and this 5 chapter, this chapter controls. 6 2. In determining the merits of a family law dispute, an 7 arbitrator shall apply the law of this state, including its 8 choice of law rules. 9 Sec. 5. NEW SECTION . 598A.5 Arbitration agreements. 10 1. An arbitration agreement must do the following: 11 a. Be in a record signed by the parties. 12 b. Identify the arbitrator, an arbitration organization, or 13 a method of selecting an arbitrator. 14 c. Identify the family law dispute the parties intend to 15 arbitrate. 16 2. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, an 17 agreement in a record to arbitrate a family law dispute that 18 arises between the parties before, at the time, or after 19 the agreement is made is valid and enforceable as any other 20 contract and irrevocable except on a ground that exists at law 21 or in equity for the revocation of a contract. 22 3. An agreement to arbitrate a child custody dispute or 23 child support dispute that arises between the parties after the 24 agreement is made is unenforceable unless any of the following 25 apply: 26 a. The parties affirm the agreement in a record after the 27 dispute arises. 28 b. The agreement was entered during a family law proceeding 29 and the court approved or incorporated the agreement in an 30 order issued in the proceeding. 31 4. If a party objects to arbitration on the grounds the 32 arbitration agreement is unenforceable or the agreement does 33 not include a family law dispute, the court shall decide 34 whether the agreement is enforceable or includes the family law 35 -3- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 3/ 20 S.F. 2371 dispute. 1 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 598A.6 Notice of arbitration. 2 A party shall initiate arbitration by giving notice to 3 arbitrate to the other party in the manner specified in the 4 arbitration agreement or, in the absence of a specified manner, 5 under section 679A.15. 6 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 598A.7 Motion for judicial relief. 7 1. A motion for judicial relief under this chapter shall be 8 made to the court in which a proceeding is pending involving a 9 family law dispute subject to arbitration or, if no proceeding 10 is pending, a court with jurisdiction over the parties and the 11 subject matter. 12 2. On motion by a party, the court may compel arbitration 13 if the parties have entered into an arbitration agreement that 14 complies with section 598A.5 unless the court determines under 15 section 598A.12 that the arbitration should not proceed. 16 3. On motion of a party, the court shall terminate 17 arbitration if the court determines any of the following: 18 a. The agreement to arbitrate is unenforceable. 19 b. The family law dispute is not subject to arbitration. 20 c. Under section 598A.12, the arbitration should not 21 proceed. 22 4. Unless prohibited by an arbitration agreement, on motion 23 of a party, the court may order consolidation of separate 24 arbitrations involving the same parties and a common issue 25 of law or fact if necessary for the fair and expeditious 26 resolution of the family law dispute. 27 Sec. 8. NEW SECTION . 598A.8 Qualification and selection of 28 arbitrator. 29 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, unless 30 waived in a record by the parties, an arbitrator must be all of 31 the following: 32 a. An attorney at law, a former attorney at law on inactive 33 status, or a retired judge. 34 b. Have successfully completed a combined five hours of 35 -4- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 4/ 20 S.F. 2371 instruction in an accredited continuing legal education course 1 on domestic violence and child abuse. 2 2. The identification in the arbitration agreement of an 3 arbitrator, arbitration organization, or method of selection of 4 the arbitrator controls. 5 3. If an arbitrator is unable or unwilling to act or if the 6 agreed-upon method of selecting an arbitrator fails, on motion 7 of a party, the court shall select an arbitrator. 8 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 598A.9 Disclosure by arbitrator ââ 9 disqualification. 10 1. Before agreeing to serve as an arbitrator, an individual, 11 after making reasonable inquiry, shall disclose to all parties 12 any known fact a reasonable person would believe is likely to 13 affect any of the following: 14 a. The impartiality of the arbitrator, including bias, 15 a financial or personal interest in the outcome of the 16 arbitration, or an existing or past relationship with a party, 17 attorney representing a party, or witness. 18 b. The arbitratorâs ability to make a timely award. 19 2. a. An arbitrator, the parties, and the attorneys 20 representing the parties have a continuing obligation to 21 disclose to all parties any known fact a reasonable person 22 would believe is likely to affect the impartiality of the 23 arbitrator or the arbitratorâs ability to make a timely award. 24 b. The arbitrator shall disclose, and provide in writing to 25 the parties, the amount of initial fee, any hourly rate to be 26 charged, the process for invoices and payment for services and 27 information on the arbitration process, specifically including 28 how to terminate the arbitration. 29 3. An objection to selection or continued service of 30 an arbitrator and a motion for a stay of arbitration and 31 disqualification of the arbitrator shall be made under section 32 598A.7. 33 4. If a disclosure required by subsection 1, paragraph 34 âaâ , or subsection 2 is not made, the court may do any of the 35 -5- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 5/ 20 S.F. 2371 following: 1 a. On motion of a party not later than fifteen days after 2 the failure to disclose is known, or by the exercise of 3 reasonable care should have been known to the party, suspend 4 the arbitration. 5 b. On timely motion of party, vacate an award under section 6 598A.19, subsection 1, paragraph âbâ . 7 c. If an award has been confirmed, grant other appropriate 8 relief under law of this state other than this chapter. 9 5. If the parties agree to discharge an arbitrator or 10 the arbitrator is disqualified, the parties by agreement may 11 select a new arbitrator or request the court to select another 12 arbitrator as provided for in section 598A.8. 13 Sec. 10. NEW SECTION . 598A.10 Party participation. 14 1. A party may do all of the following: 15 a. Be represented in an arbitration by counsel. 16 b. Be accompanied by an individual who will not be called as 17 a witness or act as an advocate. 18 c. Participate in the arbitration to the full extent 19 permitted under section 598A.13 and chapter 679A. 20 2. A party or representative of a party shall not 21 communicate ex parte with the arbitrator except to the extent 22 allowed in a family law proceeding for communication with a 23 judge. 24 Sec. 11. NEW SECTION . 598A.11 Temporary order or award. 25 1. Before an arbitrator is selected and able to act, on 26 motion of a party, the court may enter a temporary order under 27 section 598.10 or 600B.40A and the applicable Iowa rules of 28 civil procedure. 29 2. After an arbitrator is selected, all of the following 30 apply: 31 a. The arbitrator may make a temporary award under section 32 598.10 or 600B.40A and the applicable Iowa rules of civil 33 procedure. 34 b. If the matter is urgent and the arbitrator is not able to 35 -6- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 6/ 20 S.F. 2371 act in a timely manner or provide an adequate remedy, on motion 1 of a party, the court may enter a temporary order. 2 3. On motion of a party, before the court confirms a final 3 award, the court, under section 598A.16, 598A.18, or 598A.19, 4 may confirm, correct, vacate, or amend a temporary award made 5 under subsection 2, paragraph âaâ . 6 4. On motion of a party, the court may enforce a subpoena 7 or interim award issued by an arbitrator for the fair and 8 expeditious disposition of the arbitration. 9 Sec. 12. NEW SECTION . 598A.12 Protection of party or child. 10 1. a. This subsection applies if a party is subject 11 to a protection order or the arbitrator determines there 12 is a reasonable basis to believe a party is the victim of 13 domestic violence or a partyâs safety or ability to participate 14 effectively in arbitration is otherwise at risk. 15 b. If the conditions described in paragraph âaâ are met, 16 the arbitrator shall stay the arbitration and refer the parties 17 to court. The arbitration shall not proceed unless the party 18 at risk affirms the arbitration agreement in a record and the 19 court determines all of the following are true: 20 (1) The affirmation is informed and voluntary. 21 (2) Arbitration is not inconsistent with the protection 22 order. 23 (3) Reasonable procedures are in place to protect the party 24 from risk of harm, harassment, or intimidation. 25 2. If the arbitrator determines that there is a reasonable 26 basis to believe a child who is the subject of a child custody 27 dispute is abused or neglected, the arbitrator shall terminate 28 the arbitration of the child custody dispute and report the 29 abuse or neglect to the court, or to another appropriate 30 authority. 31 3. An arbitrator may make a temporary award to protect a 32 party or child from harm, harassment, or intimidation. 33 4. On motion of a party, the court may stay arbitration and 34 review a determination or temporary award under this section. 35 -7- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 7/ 20 S.F. 2371 5. This section supplements remedies available under 1 law of this state other than this chapter for the protection 2 of victims of domestic violence, family violence, stalking, 3 harassment, and similar abuse. 4 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 598A.13 Powers and duties of 5 arbitrator. 6 1. An arbitrator shall conduct an arbitration in a manner 7 the arbitrator considers appropriate for a fair and expeditious 8 disposition of the family law dispute. 9 2. An arbitrator shall provide each party a right to be 10 heard, to present evidence material to the family law dispute, 11 and to cross-examine witnesses. 12 3. Unless the parties otherwise agree in a record, an 13 arbitrator may do all of the following: 14 a. Select the rules for conducting the arbitration. 15 b. Hold a conference with the parties before a hearing. 16 c. Determine the date, time, and place of a hearing. 17 d. Require a party to provide all of the following: 18 (1) A copy of a relevant court order. 19 (2) Information required to be disclosed in a family law 20 proceeding under chapters 598 and 600B and the applicable Iowa 21 rules of civil procedure. 22 (3) A proposed award which addresses each issue in 23 arbitration. 24 e. Interview a child who is the subject of a child custody 25 dispute. 26 f. Appoint a private expert at the expense of the parties. 27 g. Administer an oath or affirmation and issue a subpoena 28 for the attendance of a witness or the production of documents 29 and other evidence at a hearing. 30 h. Permit and compel discovery concerning the family law 31 dispute and determine the date, time, and place of discovery. 32 i. Determine the admissibility and weight of evidence. 33 j. Permit deposition of a witness for use as evidence at a 34 hearing. 35 -8- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 8/ 20 S.F. 2371 k. For good cause, prohibit a party from disclosing 1 information. 2 l. Appoint an attorney, guardian ad litem, or other 3 representative for a child at the expense of the parties. 4 m. Impose a procedure to protect a party or child from risk 5 of harm, harassment, or intimidation. 6 n. Allocate arbitration fees, attorney fees, expert witness 7 fees, and other costs to the parties. 8 o. Impose a sanction on a party for bad faith or misconduct 9 during the arbitration according to standards governing 10 imposition of a sanction for litigant misconduct in a family 11 law proceeding. 12 4. An arbitrator shall not allow ex parte communication 13 except to the extent allowed in a family law proceeding for 14 communication with a judge. 15 Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 598A.14 Recording of hearing. 16 An arbitration hearing need not be recorded unless required 17 by the arbitrator, provided by the arbitration agreement, or 18 requested by a party. 19 Sec. 15. NEW SECTION . 598A.15 Award. 20 1. An arbitrator shall make an award in a record, dated and 21 signed by the arbitrator. The arbitrator shall give notice of 22 the award to each party by a method agreed on by the parties 23 or, if the parties have not agreed on a method, under section 24 679A.15. 25 2. a. Except as provided in paragraph âbâ , the arbitrator 26 shall make written findings explaining an award. 27 b. Except as provided in subsection 3, the parties, by 28 agreement, may stipulate that paragraph âaâ does not apply. 29 3. Notwithstanding subsection 2, paragraph âbâ , for an award 30 determining a child custody dispute or a child support dispute, 31 the arbitrator shall state the reasons on which the award is 32 based as required by chapter 598. 33 4. An award is not enforceable as a judgment until confirmed 34 under section 598A.16. 35 -9- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 9/ 20 S.F. 2371 Sec. 16. NEW SECTION . 598A.16 Confirmation of award. 1 1. After an arbitrator gives notice under section 598A.15, 2 subsection 1, or makes a correction under section 598A.17, a 3 party may move the court for an order confirming the award or, 4 when applicable, entry of the decree of dissolution of marriage 5 incorporating the award. 6 2. Except as set forth in subsection 3, the court shall 7 confirm an award if any of the following apply: 8 a. The parties agree in a record to confirmation. 9 b. All of the following apply: 10 (1) The time period under section 598A.18 has expired, and 11 no motion is pending under section 598A.18. 12 (2) The time period under section 598A.19, subsection 5, has 13 expired, and no motion is pending under section 598A.19. 14 3. If an award determines a child custody dispute or a 15 child support dispute, the court shall confirm the award under 16 subsection 2 if the court finds, after a review of the record 17 if necessary, that the award on its face does all of the 18 following: 19 a. Complies with section 598A.15 and chapter 598 or 600B. 20 b. Is in the best interests of the child. 21 4. On confirmation, an award is enforceable as a judgment. 22 5. Unless the parties otherwise agree, the arbitration 23 proceedings and the arbitration award are confidential. If 24 either party includes, in the motion under subsection 1, a 25 request that the arbitration award be filed under seal, the 26 court shall file the award under seal. 27 Sec. 17. NEW SECTION . 598A.17 Correction by arbitrator of 28 unconfirmed award. 29 On motion of a party made not later than twenty days after 30 an arbitrator gives notice under section 598A.15, subsection 31 1, the arbitrator may correct the award if the award has an 32 evident mathematical miscalculation or an evident mistake in 33 the description of a person, thing, or property or to clarify 34 the award. 35 -10- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 10/ 20 S.F. 2371 Sec. 18. NEW SECTION . 598A.18 Correction or confirmation 1 by court of unconfirmed award. 2 1. On motion of a party made not later than thirty days 3 after an arbitrator gives notice under section 598A.15, 4 subsection 1, or makes a correction under section 598A.17, the 5 court shall correct the award if any of the following are true: 6 a. The award has an evident mathematical miscalculation or 7 an evident mistake in the description of a person, thing, or 8 property. 9 b. The arbitrator made an award on a family law dispute not 10 submitted to the arbitrator, and the award may be corrected 11 without affecting the merits of the issues submitted. 12 2. A motion under this section to correct an award may be 13 joined with a motion to vacate or amend the award under section 14 598A.19. 15 3. Unless a motion under section 598A.19 is pending, the 16 court may confirm a corrected award under section 598A.16. 17 Sec. 19. NEW SECTION . 598A.19 Vacation, amendment, or 18 confirmation by court of unconfirmed award. 19 1. Subject to subsection 2, on motion of a party, the 20 court shall vacate an unconfirmed award if the moving party 21 establishes any of the following: 22 a. The award was procured by corruption, fraud, or other 23 undue means. 24 b. There was any of the following: 25 (1) Evident partiality by the arbitrator. 26 (2) Corruption by the arbitrator. 27 (3) Misconduct by the arbitrator substantially prejudicing 28 the rights of a party. 29 c. The arbitrator refused to postpone a hearing on showing 30 of sufficient cause for postponement, refused to consider 31 evidence material to the controversy, or otherwise conducted 32 the hearing contrary to section 598A.13, so as to prejudice 33 substantially the rights of a party. 34 d. The arbitrator exceeded the arbitratorâs powers. 35 -11- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 11/ 20 S.F. 2371 e. No arbitration agreement exists, unless the moving 1 party participated in the arbitration without making a motion 2 under section 598A.7 not later than the beginning of the first 3 arbitration hearing. 4 f. The arbitration was conducted without proper notice under 5 section 598A.6, so as to prejudice substantially the rights of 6 a party. 7 2. Subject to subsection 3, on motion of a party, the court 8 shall vacate an unconfirmed award which determines a child 9 custody dispute or a child support dispute if the moving party 10 establishes any of the following: 11 a. That the award does not comply with section 598A.15 or 12 chapter 598 or 600B or is contrary to the best interests of the 13 child. 14 b. That the statement of reasons in the award is inadequate 15 for the court to review the award. 16 c. That a ground for vacating the award under subsection 1 17 exists. 18 3. If an award is subject to vacation under subsection 19 2, paragraph âaâ , on motion of a party, the court may amend 20 the award, if amending rather than vacating is in the best 21 interests of the child. 22 4. The court may determine a motion under subsection 2 or 23 3 as follows: 24 a. Based on the record of the arbitration hearing, if the 25 hearing was recorded, and facts occurring after the hearing. 26 b. If there is no record, de novo. 27 5. A motion under this section to vacate or amend an award 28 must be filed not later than thirty days after the following: 29 a. Except as set forth in paragraph âbâ , after an arbitrator 30 gives notice under section 598A.15, subsection 1, or makes a 31 correction under section 598A.17. 32 b. For a motion under subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , the 33 ground of corruption, fraud, or other undue means is known or, 34 by the exercise of reasonable care, should be known to the 35 -12- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 12/ 20 S.F. 2371 party filing the motion. 1 6. If the court under this section vacates an award for a 2 reason other than the absence of an enforceable arbitration 3 agreement, the court may order a rehearing before an 4 arbitrator. The rehearing shall be before another arbitrator 5 if the reason for vacating the award is any of the following: 6 a. The award was procured by corruption, fraud, or other 7 undue means. 8 b. There was evident partiality, corruption, or misconduct 9 by the arbitrator. 10 7. If the court under this section denies a motion to vacate 11 or amend an award, unless a motion is pending under section 12 598A.18, the court may confirm the award under section 598A.16. 13 Sec. 20. NEW SECTION . 598A.20 Clarification of confirmed 14 award. 15 If the meaning or effect of an award confirmed under section 16 598A.16 is in dispute, the parties may do any of the following: 17 1. Agree to arbitrate the family law dispute before the 18 original arbitrator or another arbitrator. 19 2. Proceed under rule of civil procedure 1.1101. 20 Sec. 21. NEW SECTION . 598A.21 Judgment on award. 21 1. On granting an order confirming, vacating without 22 directing a rehearing, or amending an award under this chapter, 23 the court shall enter judgment in conformity with the order. 24 2. On motion of a party, the court shall order that a 25 document or part of the arbitration record be sealed or 26 redacted to prevent public disclosure of all or part of the 27 record or award. 28 Sec. 22. NEW SECTION . 598A.22 Modification of confirmed 29 award or judgment. 30 If a party requests under law of this state other than 31 this chapter modification of an award confirmed under section 32 598A.16 or of a judgment on an award, based on a fact occurring 33 after confirmation: 34 1. The parties shall proceed under the dispute resolution 35 -13- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 13/ 20 S.F. 2371 method specified in the award or judgment. 1 2. If the award or judgment does not specify a dispute 2 resolution method, the parties may do any of the following: 3 a. Agree to arbitrate the modification before the original 4 arbitrator or another arbitrator. 5 b. Absent agreement, proceed under chapter 598 or 600B and 6 the applicable Iowa rules of civil procedure. 7 Sec. 23. NEW SECTION . 598A.23 Enforcement of confirmed 8 award. 9 1. A court shall enforce an award confirmed under section 10 598A.16, including a temporary award, in the manner and to the 11 same extent as any other order or judgment of a court. 12 2. A court shall enforce an arbitration award in a family 13 law dispute confirmed by a court in another state in the manner 14 and to the same extent as any other order or judgment from 15 another state. 16 Sec. 24. NEW SECTION . 598A.24 Appeal. 17 1. An appeal may be taken under this chapter from all of the 18 following: 19 a. An order granting or denying a motion to compel 20 arbitration. 21 b. An order granting or denying a motion to stay 22 arbitration. 23 c. An order confirming or denying confirmation of an award. 24 d. An order correcting an award. 25 e. An order vacating an award without directing a rehearing. 26 f. A final judgment. 27 2. An appeal under this section may be taken as from an 28 order or a judgment in a civil action. 29 Sec. 25. NEW SECTION . 598A.26 Uniformity of application 30 and construction. 31 In applying and construing this uniform act, consideration 32 must be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with 33 respect to its subject matter among states that enact it. 34 Sec. 26. NEW SECTION . 598A.27 Relation to Electronic 35 -14- LSB 5935SV (2) 91 lh/jh 14/ 20 S.F. 2371 Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act. 1 To the extent permitted by section 102 of the federal 2 Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 3 U.S.C. Â§7002, this chapter may supersede provisions of that 4 Act. 5 Sec. 27. NEW SECTION . 598A.28 Transitional provision. 6 1. This chapter applies to arbitration of a family law 7 dispute under an arbitration agreement made on or after the 8 effective date of this Act. 9 2. If an arbitration agreement was made before the effective 10 date of this Act, the parties may agree in a record that this 11 chapter applies to the arbitration. 12